District of Columbia statutes.
47-3309

Reference by Mayor to the Superior Court.

In any matter affecting taxation, the determination of which is by law left to the discretion of the Mayor, the Mayor may, if he so elects, refer such matter to the Superior Court to make findings of fact and submit recommendations, such findings of fact and recommendations, if any, to be advisory only and not binding on the Mayor, and shall be without prejudice to the Mayor to make such further and other inquiry and investigation concerning such matter as he in his discretion shall consider necessary or advisable.

History

Aug. 17, 1937, 50 Stat. 692, ch. 690, title IX, § 13
July 26, 1939, 53 Stat. 1110, ch. 367, title IV, § 5(c)
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 574, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 156(g)
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-3309.
1973 Ed., § 47-2412.